Utah statutes.
41-6a-512.   Factual basis for alcohol or drug-related reckless driving plea.

(1) (a)  The prosecution shall state for the record a factual basis for a plea, including whether or not there had been consumption of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of both, by the defendant in connection with the violation when the prosecution agrees to a plea of guilty or no contest to a charge of a violation of the following in satisfaction of, or as a substitute for, an original charge of a violation of Section 41-6a-502 for an offense committed before July 1, 2008:

(i)  reckless driving under Section 41-6a-528; or

(ii)  an ordinance enacted under Section 41-6a-510.

(b)  The statement under Subsection (1)(a) is an offer of proof of the facts that shows whether there was consumption of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of both, by the defendant, in connection with the violation.

(2)  The court shall advise the defendant before accepting the plea offered under this section of the consequences of a violation of Section 41-6a-528.

(3)  The court shall notify the Driver License Division of each conviction of Section 41-6a-528 entered under this section.

(4) (a)  The provisions in Subsections 41-6a-505(1), (2), and (3) that require a sentencing court to order a convicted person to participate in a screening, an assessment, or an educational series or obtain substance abuse treatment or do a combination of those things, apply to a conviction for a violation of Section 41-6a-528 under Subsection (1).

(b)  The court shall render the same order regarding screening, assessment, an educational series, or substance abuse treatment in connection with a first, second, or subsequent conviction under Section 41-6a-528 under Subsection (1), as the court would render in connection with applying respectively, the first, second, or subsequent conviction requirements of Subsections 41-6a-505(1), (2), and (3).



Amended by Chapter 226, 2008 General Session

